Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
PART 2 Treated Timber Products

2-14-100 through 2-14-113.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1418, §§ 1-14; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-13/HB 1055; repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1098, § 1/SB 357, effective July 1, 2012.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 1098, § 1/SB 357 repealed and reserved this part, effective July 1, 2012.